Massachusetts, session 194th, H4386.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
To amend the Town Charter, Section C-6-3 ANNUAL BUDGET PROCESS, as follows:
Proposed addition(s) in bold and underscored, deletions by striking through:
The select board, after consultation in collaboration with the town administrator, finance
director, and finance committee chair, shall issue a policy statement that shall establish the
general guidelines for the next town budget. written directive to department heads outlining the
overarching principles and priorities to guide in the preparation of budget requests for the next
fiscal year.
Or take any other action relative thereon or in relation thereto.
of 1